California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36063.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, purchase, use, or represent as market milk or market cream any milk or cream which does not meet the requirements and standards of market milk or market cream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36064.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, it is unlawful for any person to sell, purchase, use, or represent as market milk or market cream any milk or cream which is combined with any other substance or compound.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36065.

It is unlawful for any person to serve to any customer for consumption on the premises milk or cream which is combined with any other substance or compound and represented as a substitute for or to take the place of market milk or market cream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Restricted Use and Exclusion Based Upon Dairy Score [36091. - 36092.]

36091.

Milk that is delivered by the producer of the milk, to be sold as any grade of market milk, shall not be restricted in use or excluded from the market if a score of the dairy farm on which the milk is produced is below the specified minimum legal requirements unless both of the following occur:

(a) A copy of the score is promptly given to the proprietor or operator of the dairy farm and, if milk is sold in bulk to a distributor or processor, a copy of the notice is also given or mailed to the distributor or processor.

(b) A rescore, after 10 days, shows the score of the dairy farm to be still or again below the specified minimum legal requirements and a copy of the rescore is promptly given to the proprietor or operator of the dairy farm and the purchaser of the milk produced by the dairy farm and until 60 hours has elapsed after the rescore.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

36092.

If, during the 60 hours following the rescoring of a dairy farm, a protest is filed with the head of the milk inspection service under whose jurisdiction the milk of the dairy farm is sold, the milk which is produced on that dairy farm shall not be restricted in use or excluded from the market until a third score has been made and concurred in by the representative of the milk inspection service and the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Restricted Use or Exclusion [36123. - 36123.]

36123.

Whenever two of the last four consecutive bacteria counts, coliform determinations, or cooling temperatures taken on separate days exceed the limit of the standard for market milk or products of market milk, or both, the health authority or secretary shall send a notice thereof to the producer or distributor concerned. This notice shall be in effect as long as two of the last four consecutive samples exceed the limit of the standard. An additional sample shall be taken within 14 days of the sending of the notice, but not before the lapse of three days. Immediate restricted use of the market milk or product of market milk or exclusion of the market milk or product of market milk shall be instituted whenever the standard is violated by three of the last five bacteria counts, coliform determinations, or cooling temperatures, provided that no action required by this section shall be based upon a sample that is over 180 days old.

Violations of bacterial, coliform, and cooling temperature standards shall be followed promptly by inspection to determine and correct the cause. This inspection shall be made immediately when the notice required by this section is sent.

Samples may be taken from consecutive milking at the producer level and from consecutive lots of processed products and shall be taken when requested by the producer or processor. Analysis of those samples shall commence within 36 hours from their taking.

Reinstatement of the market milk or products of market milk shall be made when two consecutive samples taken within a seven-day period following notice of restricted use again meet the standard. For the purpose of this section sampling for reinstatement and the new compliance series shall begin with the first sample taken after use is restricted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Restricted Use Market Milk and Manufacturing Milk and Cream [36301. - 36331.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [36301. - 36306.]

36301.

Restricted use market milk, manufacturing milk, or manufacturing cream shall be sold only for manufacturing purposes and to be converted into some other form or product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

36302.

Restricted use market milk, manufacturing milk, or manufacturing cream shall not be sold for human consumption in a fluid state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

36303.

Restricted use market milk, manufacturing milk, or manufacturing cream shall not be sold in quantities of less than three gallons or in containers of less than three gallons capacity. Pasteurized manufacturing cream shall not be sold in quantities of less than one-half gallon or in containers of less than one-half-gallon capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

36304.

The provisions of Sections 36301, 36302, and 36303 do not apply to milk or cream which is sold by a producer to a milk products plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

36306.

Manufacturing milk or manufacturing cream may be repasteurized once.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Manufacturing Milk Standards [36331. - 36331.]

36331.

Manufacturing milk shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) It shall be free from foreign substances.

(b) It shall not contain any undesirable flavors or odors.

(c) It shall not contain more than 2,000,000 individual bacteria per milliliter as found by direct microscopic count.

In addition, manufacturing milk shall comply with the rules, regulations, and standards of the United States Department of Agriculture which govern quality standards of raw milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. MANUFACTURED PRODUCTS [36601. - 39912.]



  CHAPTER 1. Generally [36601. - 36675.]



  ARTICLE 1. Quality Standards [36601. - 36606.]

36601.

The director shall adopt, by regulation, quality standards that are necessary for any product which is defined in this division. These quality standards which are adopted by the director shall be not lower than those which are in effect under regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture, but may be higher if found by the director to effectuate the purposes of this part, and of this section, which are, among others, to provide dairy products to the consumers of this state of the highest possible quality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36602.

The director, in determining the quality of any product which is sold, but not produced and processed in this state, shall ascertain that such product will meet the minimum quality requirements which are applicable to such product by the standards which are contained in, or established by, regulations which are adopted pursuant to this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36603.

Any standard which is established pursuant to this article shall expire on the 61st day after the final adjournment of the second regular session of the Legislature commencing after the establishment or issuance of such standard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

36604.

No product for which standards are required to be established pursuant to Section 36601 is required to meet any quality standards which are in excess of those that are in effect under regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture, unless a like product is processed in this state and the processors of such like product in this state are also required to meet such higher standards.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36605.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 36604 and notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, no dairy products, as such products are defined in this division, shall be sold within this state unless they are of a quality which is comparable to that of the same product which is manufactured or processed pursuant to this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36606.

(a) Safe and suitable bacteria standards may be adopted by the director for use in specific dairy products except for varieties of hard and soft cheese. Any bacteria strain approved by the director under this section shall appear in the ingredient list of the product. The name of any bacteria strain approved by the director for use in a dairy product for which the standard does not otherwise require use of one or more bacteria strains shall appear with the product name on the principal display panel or panels of the package in letters not less than one-half the height of the letters used in the product name.

(b) The director shall establish a minimum viable organism count for any bacteria strain approved pursuant to this section in any dairy product for which the standard does not otherwise require use of one or more bacteria strains. The director shall also establish an official test procedure for the purpose of enforcing the minimum bacteria count level in any dairy products for which such a minimum has been established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1169, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Temporary Standards [36631. - 36638.]

36631.

(a) The Legislature intends that the director administer this article to accommodate, in a timely fashion, safe and wholesome milk products.

(b) This article applies to products resembling milk products that are processed and sold pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 38901) and all milk and dairy products processed and sold pursuant to this division. This article does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Combination milk and food products processed and sold pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 36661).

(2) Special varieties of cheese processed and sold pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Section 37402.

(c) For purposes of this article, “new milk product” or “new product resembling a milk product” means a product for which no state statutory or administrative regulation standard of identity exists, and may include a product that is classified by the United States Food and Drug Administration as nonstandard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36632.

(a) Upon the request of any interested person, the director may, following a properly noticed hearing, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 36634, grant a temporary standard for an initial period of one year. A temporary standard may be granted for a new milk product or a new product resembling a milk product. However, in no case shall a temporary standard be granted for a product for which a definition and standard was contained in a bill which was not enacted during the immediately preceding session of the Legislature. A hearing called pursuant to this section shall be by written brief, unless an oral hearing is specifically requested by an interested person.

(b) The petition shall include a proposed definition, standard, nomenclature, and label for the new product. The petition shall also address the relation between the proposed product and existing definitions and standards established for comparable products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36633.

(a) A hearing called pursuant to this article shall be for the following purposes:

(1) Establishing if the product proposed for a temporary standard qualifies for that standard.

(2) Evaluating whether a temporary standard has been properly sought for the proposed product definition, standard, nomenclature, and label offered by the petitioner.

(b) Following the hearing, the director shall evaluate the temporary standard request on the basis of all of the following:

(1) Testimony submitted by all interested persons.

(2) The health and safety conditions under which the proposed product will be processed and distributed.

(3) Existing definitions and standards which are established for comparable products.

(c) In granting a temporary standard, the director shall establish an appropriate definition and nomenclature as well as quality and labeling requirements applicable to the permitted product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 758, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

36634.

The processing of a petition for a temporary standard shall conform to the following schedule:

(a) Notice of the requested hearing or denial thereof shall be announced by the director within 15 days after receipt of a temporary standard petition.

(b) A hearing called pursuant to this section shall be held not later than 65 days following receipt of a temporary standard petition.

(c) The hearing shall be conducted in procedural compliance with applicable provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The petitioner for a temporary standard shall be notified of the director’s decision on the request not later than 30 days following the closing of the hearing. A temporary standard approved by the director shall be effective immediately upon issuance of the director’s decision, subject to Section 36637.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 758, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

36635.

An unsuccessful petitioner for a temporary standard may repetition not earlier than 60 days following written notification of the denial of the original temporary standard request, if the proposed definition and standard have been modified in the interim or other conditions have changed so that a favorable ruling by the director might reasonably be expected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36636.

A temporary standard granted pursuant to this article may be renewed for a period of one year if the director determines that the renewal is necessary to adequately assess the market potential of the product. A second renewal of a temporary standard may be granted at the discretion of the director, except that in no case shall the second renewal be granted if legislation intended to permanently establish a standard and definition for the product currently being marketed pursuant to a temporary standard has not been introduced during the term of the standard.

The maximum duration of a temporary standard, including any renewals, shall not exceed three years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36637.

Upon granting a petition under this article, the director shall adopt the standard as an emergency regulation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of this chapter, any regulations adopted under this article shall be deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 758, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

36638.

If the director fails to respond to a petition for a temporary standard within 65 days following receipt of the petition, the petitioner may thereafter utilize the standard. However, the right of petitioner to utilize the standard shall expire at the end of the calendar year of the Regular Session of the Legislature immediately following the year in which the use of that standard by petitioner commenced, unless that standard is enacted into law during that calendar year of the regular session of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 758, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Combination Milk and Food Products [36661. - 36662.]

36661.

In addition to the standards for milk and milk products which are adopted pursuant to this division, the director may adopt separate standards and labeling requirements for any milk or milk product to which is added a food product of a kind which is not derived from milk and for which combination of the food product with milk or milk products no standard has been established or otherwise provided for in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 512, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

36662.

Every definition, standard, and labeling requirement which is adopted pursuant to this article expires on the 91st day after the final adjournment of the next general session of the Legislature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sweeteners [36670. - 36675.]

36670.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, sweeteners approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in milk products may be added to milk products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

36671.

Prior to the use of any sweetener in a dairy product, the sweetener must be approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in that milk product or the applicable milk product category.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

36672.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a milk product containing any sweetener shall be in conformance with all provisions of the applicable product definition and the identity standard specified in this division for the product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

36673.

A milk product containing any sweetener not included in the product identity standard shall be labeled in accordance with Section 36674 and all federal requirements, including any necessary consumer warning language and all ingredient labeling regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

36674.

(a) The director shall approve the label and the name for any milk product containing any sweetener not included in the product identity standard.

(b) The director may approve any name which is accurate, descriptive, not misleading, and which is consistent with applicable federal regulations. A milk product containing a sweetener not included in the product identity standard shall use a name that is modified by an appropriate word or words consistent with federal regulations.

(c) All words constituting the name of the product as approved by the director shall be in the same type size, style, and color.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

36675.

The director shall, within 60 days after the effective date of this article, develop and distribute guidelines applicable to food handling establishments which serve milk products intended for on-premise consumption for which packaging takes place at the point of sale to the consumer. The guidelines shall specify how the use of a sweetener not included in the product identity standard shall be noticed to the consumer, including the posting of any health warning required under federal regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   Effective July 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Frozen Dairy Products [36801. - 36992.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [36801. - 36809.]

36801.

Pasteurized cream that is sold or used for ice cream, frozen dairy dessert, frozen dessert, or sherbet manufacture shall be clean, sweet, and free from undesirable flavors and odors. It shall contain not more than 75,000 bacteria per milliliter, official plate count.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 150, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

36802.

Milk and any milk product that is used in the manufacture of ice cream, frozen dairy dessert, frozen dessert, or sherbet shall be pasteurized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 150, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

36803.

Sweet butter that is used in ice cream, frozen dairy dessert, and frozen dessert shall be unsalted butter made from sweet cream that is free from undesirable flavor or odors. It shall have a rating of not less than 92 in accordance with the standards for quality of creamery butter that are established in Article 2 (commencing with Section 37131) of Chapter 3. Cream to which has been added ripener or starter, or cream that has been neutralized, is not sweet cream within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 150, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

36804.

Every product which is defined in this chapter shall be advertised and labeled in accordance with regulations which are adopted by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36805.

(a) Ice cream, frozen dairy dessert, frozen dessert, sherbet, or quiescently frozen confections when sold in package form shall be labeled with the name, address, and ZIP Code of the manufacturer, the wholesale distributor, or the retailer.

(b) If the name and address is not that of the original milk products processing plant, there shall be stamped, printed, or embossed upon the package, in a manner acceptable to the director, the plant number of the manufacturer or packer. This plant identification shall be consistent with, and not more restrictive than, the National Uniform Coding System for packaging identification of milk and milk products processing plants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

36806.

Ice cream mix, frozen yogurt mix, frozen dairy dessert mix, and frozen dessert mix are unfrozen products that are used in the manufacture of ice cream, frozen yogurt, frozen dairy dessert, or frozen dessert. They shall have been pasteurized and comply with all the requirements for ice cream, frozen yogurt, frozen dairy dessert, or frozen dessert, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 153, Sec. 5.   (AB 1486)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

36807.

The director, by regulations, may authorize the use of wholesome, edible dairy products, as permissible ingredients, in frozen dairy products, in addition to those for which standards are provided for under this code for such frozen dairy products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 528.)
-------------------------------------------

36808.

Ice cream, frozen dairy dessert, frozen dessert, and sherbet may contain safe and suitable nonmilk-derived ingredients as specified in applicable provisions of the Code of Federal Regulations. If these nonmilk-derived ingredients are used, the minimum quantity of food solids required in this chapter for ice cream, frozen dairy dessert, frozen dessert, and sherbet shall be maintained exclusively of these additives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 150, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

36809.

Federal nutritional labeling regulations apply to all frozen dairy products, except nutritional labeling provided for any frozen dairy product mix or any frozen dairy product dispensed by a soft serve establishment, shall state, on the basis of weight, the serving size upon which nutritional declarations are based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Ice Cream [36861. - 36861.]

36861.

Ice cream is a food that complies with Section 135.110 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Ice cream shall contain not more than 75,000 bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sherbet [36951. - 36952.]

36951.

Sherbet is a food that complies with Section 135.140 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Sherbet shall contain not more than 75,000 bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

36952.

Yogurt sherbet is a product that meets all the requirements and standards prescribed for sherbet, except as follows:

(a) It shall have an acidity of not less than six-tenths of 1 percent calculated as lactic acid.

(b) Bacteria standards which are specified for sherbet do not apply to yogurt sherbet.

(c) It shall have a yogurt content of not less than 40 percent.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 16.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Quiescently Frozen Confections [36981. - 36984.]

36981.

Quiescently frozen confections means a clean and wholesome frozen, sweetened, flavored product in the manufacture of which freezing, which is not accompanied with stirring or agitation (generally known as quiescent freezing), has been used. This confection may be acidulated with harmless organic acid, may contain milk solids, may be made with or without added harmless pure or imitation flavoring, and with or without added harmless coloring approved by the secretary. The finished product may contain stabilizers at a level that is necessary to achieve the desired function. Quiescently frozen confections shall contain no more than 75,000 bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

36982.

Quiescently frozen confections may be sold under trade names which are not misleading or deceptive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36983.

A quiescently frozen confection shall be manufactured in a form of servings, individually packaged, bagged, or otherwise wrapped, properly labeled, and purveyed to the consumer in their original factory-filled package.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

36984.

In the production of a quiescently frozen confection, no processing or mixing prior to the quiescent freezing shall be used that develops in the finished confection mix any physical expansion in excess of 10 percent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Frozen Yogurt [36991. - 36992.]

36991.

Frozen yogurt is a frozen dairy product. It shall be made from milk, with or without added milk solids, flavoring, or seasoning, which has been pasteurized and afterwards fermented by one or more strains of Lactobacillus bulgaricus, including yogurt strains, Streptococcus thermophilous and Lactobacillus acidophilus. It shall not be pasteurized following fermentation. It shall contain not more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram, contain not more than 10 colonies per gram each of molds, yeasts, and other fungi, and be free of any other objectionable bacteria that may impair the quality of the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   Effective August 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

36992.

Frozen yogurt shall contain not less than 3.5 percent milkfat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   Effective August 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Butter [37101. - 37292.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [37101. - 37104.]

37101.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Package” includes cartons, wrappers, or other containers which are used for the sale of butter to the retail trade.

(b) When “numerals” appear following words which relate to scoring, the numerals represent the score of the butter, 100 being a perfect score.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37102.

All scoring of butter shall be in the manner which is specified in the regulations which are adopted by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37103.

Quality designations shall be affixed on the package in a manner and fashion which is prescribed in the regulations which are adopted by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37104.

Notwithstanding Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code, butter purchased from a licensed milk products plant or retail location that is subsequently infused or mixed with medicinal or adult-use cannabis at the premises or location that is not subject to licensing as a milk product plant is exempt from the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 110.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Butter Grades [37131. - 37134.]

37131.

All butter which is sold or distributed in package form, including such butter which is received from out-of-state points, shall be classified into grades which indicate its quality and shall be labeled and advertised by the use of one of the following designations:

(a) First quality.

(b) Second quality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37132.

First quality butter is butter which scores not less than 92. The minimum requirements for first quality butter are as follows:

(a) It shall be fresh, sweet and clean in flavor if of fresh make, or sweet and clean if storage.

(b) The body shall be firm.

(c) The color shall be either light or medium and shall be uniform, except that it may show small curd specks or slight waviness.

(d) The salt shall be either light or medium, and free from grittiness.

(e) The package shall be clean, uniform, and sound.

(f) The defects in body, color, salt, and package shall not total over one point.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37133.

Second quality butter is butter which scores below 92, but not less than 90. The minimum requirements for second quality butter are as follows:

(a) It shall be fresh and fairly sweet and fairly clean in flavor if of fresh make or fairly sweet and fairly clean if storage.

(b) It may also be flat or lacking in flavor.

(c) The body shall be fairly firm, but may show slight defects in grain and texture.

(d) The color may be either light or medium and shall be fairly uniform, but may be wavy.

(e) The salt may be either light, medium or high, and shall be fairly uniform, but may be slightly gritty.

(f) The package shall be clean, uniform, and sound.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37134.

Butter which scores less than 90 shall not be sold or served to consumers. Such butter when sold shall be in bulk packages which contain not less than 30 pounds, and are labeled “for cooking and baking purposes only.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Butter Standards [37161. - 37164.]

37161.

Butter is the product made by gathering the fat or fresh or ripened milk or cream into a mass, which also contains a small portion of other milk constituents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37162.

Butter shall be clean and nonrancid and shall contain not less than 80 percent of milk fat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37163.

Butter may contain salt or a harmless coloring matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37164.

Butter flavored with spices, condiments, garlic, chives, herbs, or other flavoring may be sold in whipped or solid form, provided the product meets the following requirements:

(a) The butter, before flavoring, meets all of the requirements for USDA 93 score (AA Grade) butter.

(b) The principal flavor is identified on the container with equal prominence with the word “butter.”

(c) The principal display panel has a list of all ingredients in the descending order of predominence, and identifies the name and address of the manufacturer.

(d) The product is processed in a licensed milk products plant.

(e) The product contains no preservative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Retail Packages [37191. - 37192.]

37191.

Butter which is sold to the retail trade shall be labeled with the name and address of the manufacturer, the wholesale distributor, or the retailer. The following words shall appear above the name:

(a) The words “manufactured by” if the name of the manufacturer is given.

(b) The words “distributed by,” if the name of the wholesale distributor is given.

(c) The words “put up for” or “put up by,” as the case may be, if the name of the retailer is given.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37192.

Butter which is sold to the retail trade shall be labeled with the words “pasteurized” or “raw,” as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bulk Packages [37221. - 37224.]

37221.

Butter which is received in this state by brokers, jobbers, and other persons that receive butter in cubes, tubs, firkins, or other bulk packages shall be labeled with all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the manufacturer.

(b) The date on which the butter was manufactured.

(c) The original lot or churn number.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.

The markings shall remain on the packages until the butter which is contained in the packages is cut and wrapped for the retail trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37223.

The name of any city, county, or other geographical designation, or any word which may be pronounced the same as any city, county, or other geographical designation, except the address of the manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or retailer, whose name is printed on any package or wrapper, shall not appear upon any package or wrapper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37224.

This article does not prohibit the use of a trademark or brand which has a geographical name if it was copyrighted or registered in the office of the Secretary of State of this state prior to Janaury 1, 1923.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Imported Butter [37261. - 37262.]

37261.

Every person that sells, consigns, ships, or presents to any other person any butter that has been shipped or imported into this state from any place outside of the United States shall, before he does so, do all of the following:

(a) Cause to be stamped, marked, or printed upon the wrapper, or other container in blackface letters which are not less than one-eighth of an inch in height the word “imported.”

(b) Display in a conspicuous place in his public salesroom a sign, which shall be not less than one foot in height and two feet in length, which bears the words “imported butter sold here” in blackface letters not less than three inches in height and one-half inch in width upon a white ground.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37262.

Violation of this article is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 119.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Renovated Butter [37291. - 37292.]

37291.

Renovated butter is the product made from impure or rancid butter reduced, for the purpose of cleansing and renovating, to a liquid state by melting and draining off the liquid milk fat and afterwards churning or otherwise manipulating it in connection with milk or any product of milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

37292.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any renovated butter unless there is printed upon the label of each and every package, or other container in which such renovated butter is put up for sale or sold at retail, all of the following:

(a) The words “renovated butter” in letters which are at least as large as any other type or lettering on such label.

(b) The name and address of the manufacturer or distributor.

(c) The net weight of the contents of the package.

(d) A full and accurate statement of all the ingredients which are contained in the renovated butter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Cheese [37401. - 37601.]



  ARTICLE 1. Varieties of Cheese [37401. - 37414.]

37401.

Varieties of cheese are foods that conform to the applicable standards of identity provided for in Part 133 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Varieties of cheese that do not conform to these standards are special varieties and shall conform to the standards of composition adopted by the secretary by regulation and that are not inconsistent with the standards of identity in Part 133 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 150, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

37402.

Cheddar cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.113 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37403.

Washed-curd cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.136 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37404.

Colby cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.118 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
